Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201654-2804
Livestock Growth Act Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Livestock Growth Act Cash Fund is created. The fund may be used to carry out the Livestock Growth Act. The State Treasurer shall credit to the fund any funds transferred or appropriated to the fund by the Legislature and funds received as gifts or grants or other private or public funds obtained for the purposes of the act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2015, LB175, § 4.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.